District of Columbia statutes.
29-1010.06

Redemption or repurchase.

Property distributed to a member by a limited cooperative association, other than money, maybe redeemed or repurchased as provided in the organic rules, but a redemption or repurchase shall not be made without authorization by the board of directors. The board may withhold authorization for any reason in its sole discretion. A redemption or repurchase shall be treated as a distribution for purposes of § 29-1010.07.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1006 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.